Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-249
Judgment in partition; decree in equity; recording; effect.

Any exemplification of any decree or judgment in partition on final decree in equity affecting real estate may in like manner be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in any county in which real estate described therein may be situated. Such record or exemplification thereof shall be received in evidence and shall be as effective in all cases as the original exemplification would be if produced, and shall be open to the same objection.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 26, p. 285;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 19, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6221;

C.S.1922, § 5620;

C.S.1929, § 76-226;

R.S.1943, § 76-249.

Recording fees, see section 33-109.

Exemplification of decree quieting title to real estate must be recorded in office of register of deeds in order to claim benefits of recording act as against one whose instrument of title is first recorded. McCarthy v. Benedict, 90 Neb. 386, 133 N.W. 410 (1911).